Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.390

Nonmonthly employees, vacations and sick leaves.

Each employee of any county in this state who is employed on an hourly or per diem basis, who shall have worked fifteen hundred hours or more in any one year may in the discretion of the board of county commissioners be given the same vacations and sick leaves as are provided for the employees of the county employed on a monthly basis.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.32.390. Prior: 1951 c 187 s 1.]